Maryland, session 2025, HB0192.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–136.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “INSTRUCTIONAL TIME” MEANS ANY TIME DURING THE SCHOOL
DAY, EXCLUDING A STUDENT’S LUNCH PERIOD.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0192*

HOUSE BILL 192
(3) “PASSING PERIOD” MEANS THE TIME PERIOD BEFORE AND
BETWEEN CLASSES WHEN STUDENTS WALK THROUGH THE SCHOOL BUILDING OR
SCHOOL GROUNDS TO MOVE FROM ONE CLASS TO ANOTHER.
(B) EACH COUNTY BOARD SHALL ADOPT A POLICY PROHIBITING STUDENTS
FROM USING A CELLULAR PHONE DURING SCHOOL HOURS IN ACCORDANCE WITH
THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION.
(C) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
THE STUDENT CELLULAR PHONE USE POLICY FOR ELEMENTARY AND MIDDLE
SCHOOL STUDENTS SHALL PROHIBIT THE USE OR DISPLAY OF A CELLULAR PHONE
DURING:
(I) INSTRUCTIONAL TIME;
(II) THE STUDENT’S LUNCH PERIOD; AND
(III) IF APPLICABLE, A PASSING PERIOD.
(2) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
THE STUDENT CELLULAR PHONE USE POLICY FOR HIGH SCHOOL STUDENTS SHALL
PROHIBIT THE USE AND DISPLAY OF A CELLULAR PHONE DURING:
(I) INSTRUCTIONAL TIME; AND
(II) A PASSING PERIOD.
(3) A POLICY ADOPTED UNDER THIS SECTION MAY NOT PROHIBIT A
STUDENT WITH AN INDIVIDUALIZED EDUCATION PROGRAM, A SECTION 504 PLAN,
OR ANY OTHER DOCUMENTED HEALTH ISSUE THAT REQUIRES THE USE OF AN
ELECTRONIC DEVICE FROM USING THE STUDENT’S CELLULAR PHONE FOR THAT
PURPOSE.
(D) (1) A STUDENT IN VIOLATION OF A POLICY ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS
SECTION IS SUBJECT TO:
(I) FOR A FIRST VIOLATION, A WARNING;
(II) FOR A SECOND VIOLATION, CONFISCATION OF THE
CELLULAR PHONE; AND
(III) FOR ANY SUBSEQUENT VIOLATIONS, A DISCIPLINARY
ACTION ESTABLISHED BY THE COUNTY BOARD.

HOUSE BILL 192 3
(2) (I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, A CELLULAR PHONE CONFISCATED FROM A STUDENT IN ACCORDANCE
WITH PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION MUST BE RETRIEVED BY THE STUDENT’S
PARENT OR GUARDIAN.
(II) IF A STUDENT’S PARENT OR GUARDIAN NOTIFIES THE
SCHOOL THAT THE PARENT OR GUARDIAN IS UNABLE TO RETRIEVE THE STUDENT’S
CONFISCATED CELLULAR PHONE, THE SCHOOL SHALL RETURN THE CELLULAR
PHONE TO THE STUDENT AT THE END OF THE SCHOOL DAY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.